District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0835.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
26 act may be cited as the “Supporting Survivors of Domestic Violence and Abuse Amendment Act
27 of 2026”.
28 TITLE I. METROPOLITAN POLICE DEPARTMENT DOMESTIC VIOLENCE
29 PREVENTION AND RESPONSE.
30 Sec. 101. Domestic violence response.
31 (a) There is established within the Special Investigations Branch of the Metropolitan
32 Police Department (“MPD”) a Domestic Violence Response Unit (“Unit”) to coordinate
33 measures to reduce and respond to incidents of domestic violence and intimate partner violence
34 and other incidents of sexual or gender-based violence not otherwise assigned to the Sexual
35 Assault Unit, as appropriate. The Unit shall be led by the Director of Domestic Violence
36 Prevention and Intervention.
37 (b) The Unit shall, at a minimum, consist of:
38 (1) Two detectives and 2 lieutenants dedicated to pursuing domestic violence
39 warrants;
40 (2) One specialized domestic violence prosecutor, which may include a detail
41 from the United States Attorney’s Office;
42 (3) The Director of Domestic Violence Prevention and Intervention;
43 (4) One data specialist; and
44 (5) One victim and domestic violence specialist, who shall be assigned to liaise
45 with the Victim Services Branch.
2

46 (c) The Director of Domestic Violence Prevention and Intervention shall:
47 (1) Coordinate detectives and lieutenants pursuing domestic violence warrants;
48 (2) Coordinate with the District Domestic Violence Investigators and the District
49 Patrol Personnel providing initial response to incidents of domestic violence;
50 (3) Coordinate with the Domestic Violence Intake Center and MPD Detectives
51 supporting the Center;
52 (4) Directly supervise the 6 officers assigned to serve civil protection orders
53 pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 16-1007(e)(2) and develop strategies to improve service rates;
54 (5) Coordinate with the MPD training academy in the development and delivery
55 of high-quality training and best practices surrounding response and investigation of domestic
56 violence and intimate partner violence offenses, including 20 hours of training on the dynamics
57 of domestic violence, trauma resulting from domestic violence, crisis intervention, personal
58 safety, risk management, criminal and civil court processes, and resources available to victims;
59 (6) Liaise with advocacy organizations and survivors to gather feedback on
60 MPD’s services and help shape new programming;
61 (7) Work with internal and external stakeholders to enhance domestic violence
62 and intimate partner violence awareness and prevention through community outreach and
63 education, including the Office of Victim Services and Justice Grants, the advocacy
64 organization, a victim legal representation provider, a housing provider, a mental health service
65 provider, culturally specific service providers, and emergency response service providers;
66 (8) Collaborate with the Council, advocacy organizations, survivors, and service
67 providers to inform and advance legislative and policy goals aimed at preventing domestic
68 violence and intimate partner violence and strengthening intervention mechanisms;
3

69 (9) Coordinate, with support of the data specialists, the collection of data on
70 domestic violence and intimate partner violence statistics and programs, including those
71 mandated by the District, federal agencies, and other governing bodies and upon request from the
72 Criminal Justice Coordinating Council; and
73 (10) Work closely with the Office of the Mayor, the Domestic Violence Fatality
74 Review Board, and the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council.
75 (d) For the purposes of this section, the term:
76 (1) “Advocacy organization” means the federally recognized state coalition
77 against domestic violence and domestic violence programs that advocate for policy and system
78 improvements for survivors.
79 (2) “Prevention” means efforts to prevent further incidents of domestic violence,
80 including secondary or tertiary prevention.
81 (3) “Service providers” includes domestic violence programs as defined in D.C.
82 Official Code § 14–310(a)(3), including culturally specific service providers.
83 (4) “Survivors” includes survivors that are representative of DC’s diverse
84 communities and those that have and have not connected with specific resources or the criminal
85 legal system.
86 (e) Sexual assault, including sexual assault by an intimate partner, remains within the
87 MPD Sexual Assault Unit as provided in D.C. Official Code § 23-1909(d). The Unit established
88 in this section shall coordinate with the Sexual Assault Unit as appropriate.
89 TITLE II. DEFINING ECONOMIC AND FINANCIAL ABUSE.
90 Sec. 201. Section 3032 of the Domestic Violence Hotline Establishment Act of 2013,
91 effective Dec. 24, 2013 (D.C. Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code §4-551) is amended as follows:
4

92 (a) Paragraph (1) is redesignated as (1)(A).
93 (b) A new sub-paragraph (B) is added to read as follows:
94 “(B) “Economic or financial abuse,” in the context of domestic violence, dating violence,
95 and abuse in later life, means the use of or threats of the use of force, fraud, or manipulation to
96 coerce, impair, restrict, sabotage, interfere with or unreasonably control an individual’s ability to
97 acquire, use, or maintain economic resources to which they are entitled, including by:
98 “(i) Exerting undue influence or control over an individual’s financial and economic
99 behavior or decisions, including by withholding or restricting an individual’s access to, or
100 acquisition of, money, assets, credit, or financial information without their effective consent or
101 by forcing default on joint or other financial obligations, exploiting powers of attorney,
102 guardianship, or conservatorship, or failing or neglecting to act in the best interests of a person to
103 whom one has a fiduciary duty;
104 “(ii) Unfairly using the personal identifying information of another individual for one’s
105 own advantage to obtain credit, a good, a service or anything of value in the name of that
106 individual without their effective consent;
107 “(iii) Interfering with the individual’s ability to attend school or employment; or
108 “(iv) Withholding from an individual physical resources such as food, clothing, shelter,
109 medications or services necessary to maintain the individual’s physical or mental health.”.
110 TITLE III. IMPROVING GUN RELINQUISHMENT.
111 Sec. 301. Subchapter I of Chapter 10 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Official
112 Code is amended as follows:
113 (a) Section 16-1001 is amended by adding a new paragraph (12A) to read as follows:
114 “(12A) “Relinquish” means to surrender all firearms and ammunition in the
5

115 Respondent’s possession or control to law enforcement or a licensed gun dealer.”.
116 (b) Section 16-1004 is amended by adding a new subsection (h-1) to read as follows:
117 “(h-1)(1) If a respondent peaceably relinquishes any firearms or ammunition pursuant to
118 an order issued under this subchapter, such relinquishment shall preclude the arrest and
119 prosecution of the respondent for violating, with respect to the firearms or ammunition
120 surrendered:
121 “(A) § 7-2506.01; and
122 “(B) §§ 22-4503 and 22-4504(a) and (a-1).
123 “(2) The relinquishment of any firearm or ammunition pursuant to this subchapter
124 shall not constitute a voluntary surrender for the purposes of § 7-2507.05.”.
125 (c) Section 16-1005(c)(10) is amended by striking the phrase “relinquish possession of
126 any firearms or ammunition” and inserting the phrase “relinquish possession of any firearms or
127 ammunition, consistent with § 16-1004(h-1),” in its place.
128 TITLE IV. COURT CONSIDERATION OF LETHALITY FACTORS.
129 Sec. 401. Section 23-1322(b) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
130 adding a new paragraph (3) to read as follows:
131 “(3) When a person charged with the commission of any intrafamily offense or a
132 violation of a civil protection order or anti-stalking order appears before the court, the judicial
133 officer may, in determining whether any condition or combination of conditions of release will
134 reasonably assure the appearance of the person as required and the safety of any other person and
135 the community, take into account information available concerning the following:
136 “(A) Whether the person charged, at the time of the alleged offense, was
137 subject to the terms of a protection order or previously was convicted of or pleaded guilty to an
6

138 intrafamily offense of violation of a protection order, or a violation of an existing or former
139 municipal ordinance or law of this or any other jurisdiction or the United States that is
140 substantially similar to either section; and
141 “(B) To the extent that information about any of the following is available
142 to the court, the judicial officer may consider all of the following, in addition to any other
143 circumstances considered by the court, before issuing an order regarding pretrial detention or
144 conditions of release for a person who appears before the court pursuant to subparagraph (A) of
145 this subsection:
146 “(i) Whether the person has a history of prior convictions for
147 domestic violence, intrafamily offense, or a history of other violent acts;
148 “(ii) Whether the person has a history of prior convictions for
149 violating the orders of any court or governmental entity;
150 “(iii) Whether the person is potentially a threat to any other person;
151 “(iv) Whether the person has access to deadly weapons or a history
152 of using deadly weapons;
153 “(v) Whether the person has a history of abusing alcohol or any
154 controlled substance;
155 “(vi) The severity of the alleged violence that is the basis of the
156 offense, including but not limited to, the duration of the alleged violent incident, and whether the
157 alleged violent incident involved serious physical injury, sexual assault, strangulation, abuse
158 during the alleged victim's pregnancy, abuse of pets, or forcible entry to gain access to the
159 alleged victim;
160 “(vii) Whether a termination of the relationship or the initiation of
7

161 a divorce proceeding between the person and the alleged victim has recently occurred or is
162 pending;
163 “(viii) Whether the person has exhibited obsessive or controlling
164 behaviors toward the alleged victim, including but not limited to, stalking, surveillance, or
165 isolation of the alleged victim; and
166 “(ix) Any information contained in the complaint and any police
167 reports, affidavits, or other documents accompanying the complaint.”.
168 TITLE V. VICTIM PRIVACY.
169 Sec. 501. Section 204(a)(2A)(B) of the Freedom of Information Act of 1976, effective
170 March 29, 1977 (D.C. Law 1-96; D.C. Official Code § 2-534(a)(2A)(B)), is amended to read as
171 follows:
172 “(B) Related to an incident involving domestic violence as defined in section 3032(1) of
173 the Domestic Violence Hotline Establishment Act of 2013, effective December 24, 2013 (D.C.
174 Law 20-61; D.C. Official Code § 4-551(1)), an intrafamily offense as defined in D.C. Official
175 Code § 16-1001(8)), human trafficking as defined in the Prohibition Against Human Trafficking
176 Amendment Act of 2010, effective October 23, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-239; D.C. Official Code §
177 22-1832-4), , stalking as defined in section 503 of the Omnibus Public Safety and Justice
178 Amendment Act of 2009, effective December 10, 2009 (D.C. Law 18-88; D.C. Official Code §
179 22-3133), or sexual assault as defined in D.C. Official Code § 23-1907(a)(7).”.
180 TITLE VI. FISCAL IMPACT STATEMENT; EFFECTIVE DATE.
181 Sec. 601. Fiscal impact statement.
182 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
183 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
8

184 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
185 Sec. 602. Effective date.
186 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
187 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 60-day period of congressional review
188 as provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
189 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)).
9